Maryland, session 2025, HB1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–209.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1271*

HOUSE BILL 1271
(a) In this section, “viable” means that stage when, in the best clinical judgment
of the qualified provider based on the particular facts of the case before the qualified
provider, there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus’s sustained survival outside the womb.
(b) Except as PROVIDED IN § 20–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR AS otherwise
provided in this subtitle, the State may not interfere with the decision of a woman to
terminate a pregnancy:
(1) Before the fetus is viable; or
(2) At any time during the woman’s pregnancy, if:
(i) The termination procedure is necessary to protect the life or
health of the woman; or
(ii) The fetus is affected by genetic defect or serious deformity or
abnormality.
(c) The Department may adopt regulations that:
(1) Are both necessary and the least intrusive method to protect the life or
health of the woman; and
(2) Are not inconsistent with established clinical practice.
(d) The qualified provider is not liable for civil damages or subject to a criminal
penalty for a decision to perform an abortion under this section made in good faith and in
the qualified provider’s best clinical judgment in accordance with accepted standards of
clinical practice AND § 20–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
20–210.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A WOMAN SEEKING AN ABORTION IF:
(1) THE WOMAN IS THE VICTIM OF AN ALLEGED RAPE OR OF INCEST,
AS PROHIBITED UNDER § 3–323 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE INCIDENT OF RAPE OR INCEST IS REPORTED TO LAW
ENFORCEMENT.
(B) A QUALIFIED PROVIDER MAY NOT PERFORM OR INDUCE AN ABORTION
ON A PREGNANT WOMAN:
(1) WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER THE WOMAN RECEIVES
TRANSABDOMINAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)

HOUSE BILL 1271 3
OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) IF THE WOMAN RESIDES AT LEAST 100 MILES FROM THE FACILITY
IN WHICH THE ABORTION WILL BE PERFORMED, WITHIN 2 HOURS AFTER THE
WOMAN RECEIVES TRANSABDOMINAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL PERFORMING THE TRANSABDOMINAL
ULTRASOUND IMAGING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MUST:
(1) BE TRAINED IN SONOGRAPHY AND WORKING UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF A QUALIFIED PROVIDER;
(2) IF POSSIBLE, DETERMINE THE GESTATIONAL AGE OF THE FETUS
BASED ON:
(I) MEASUREMENT OF THE FETUS IN A MANNER CONSISTENT
WITH THE STANDARD OF CARE; OR
(II) IF ONLY THE GESTATIONAL SAC IS VISIBLE DURING THE
TRANSABDOMINAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING, MEASUREMENT OF THE GESTATIONAL
SAC;
(3) IF GESTATIONAL AGE CANNOT BE DETERMINED UNDER ITEM (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, VERBALLY OFFER TO THE WOMAN OTHER ULTRASOUND
IMAGING TO DETERMINE GESTATIONAL AGE OF THE FETUS;
(4) IF PRESENT AND VIEWABLE, INCLUDE IN THE ULTRASOUND
IMAGE:
(I) THE DIMENSIONS OF THE FETUS; AND
(II) AN ACCURATE PORTRAYAL OF THE PRESENCE OF
EXTERNAL MEMBERS AND INTERNAL ORGANS OF THE FETUS;
(5) MAKE A PRINT OF THE ULTRASOUND IMAGE TO DOCUMENT ANY
MEASUREMENTS TAKEN TO DETERMINE THE GESTATIONAL AGE OF THE FETUS;
(6) VERBALLY OFFER TO THE WOMAN DURING THE
TRANSABDOMINAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING THE OPTION TO:
(I) VIEW THE ULTRASOUND IMAGE;

HOUSE BILL 1271
(II) RECEIVE A PRINTED COPY OF THE ULTRASOUND IMAGE;
AND
(III) HEAR THE FETAL HEARTBEAT IN A MANNER CONSISTENT
WITH THE STANDARD OF CARE; AND
(7) OBTAIN FROM THE WOMAN WRITTEN CERTIFICATION THAT:
(I) THE MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL PERFORMING THE
TRANSABDOMINAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING OFFERED OPTIONS AS REQUIRED UNDER
ITEM (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) IF APPLICABLE, THE WOMAN RESIDES AT LEAST 100 MILES
FROM THE FACILITY IN WHICH THE ABORTION WILL BE PERFORMED.
(D) A WOMAN IS NOT REQUIRED TO ACCEPT ANYTHING OFFERED DURING
TRANSABDOMINAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING OFFERS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(3) AND (6) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE FACILITY IN WHICH AN ABORTION IS PERFORMED SHALL MAINTAIN
A PRINTED COPY OF THE ULTRASOUND IMAGE MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(5) OF
THIS SECTION FOR THE GREATER OF:
(1) 7 YEARS; OR
(2) AN AMOUNT OF TIME AS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
(F) A QUALIFIED PROVIDER WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A
PENALTY OF UP TO $2,500.
(G) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A QUALIFIED
PROVIDER FROM USING ULTRASOUND IMAGING THAT THE QUALIFIED PROVIDER
CONSIDERS MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE, CONSISTENT WITH THE STANDARD OF CARE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.